arb-verbs-lexc.txt
! Arabic Verbs
Multichar_Symbols
+verb
+masc 
+fem 
+sg 
+dual 
+pl
+pres 
+past 
+imp
+active
+pass
+1pers
+2pers
+3pers
+ques
+conj
+comp
+fut
+art
+token
+objpron
! Intermediate language
^ss^ ! stem start, intermediate language for the purpose of assimilation 
^se^ ! stem end, intermediate language for the purpose of assimilation
^orig
^dbl

! Flag Diacritics
@U.T.PRES@ ! tense present 
@U.T.PAST@ ! tense past 
@U.T.IRREL@ ! tense irrelevant (with imperative)
@U.V.A@ ! voice active 
@U.V.P@ ! voice passive 
@U.V.IR@ ! voice irrelevant (with imperative)
@U.M.D@ ! mood declarative 
@U.M.I@ ! mood imperative 
@D.M.I@ ! disallow mood imperative 

@U.PERS.1@ ! present person 1st
@U.PERS.2@ ! present person 2nd
@U.PERS.3A@ ! present person 3rd with y
@U.PERS.3B@ ! present person 3rd with t

@D.V.P@ ! disallow voice passive
@D.PERS.1@ ! disallow present person 1st
@D.PERS.2@ ! disallow present person 2nd

@U.CASE.ACC@ ! case accusative
@U.CASE.NOM@ ! case nominative

@U.TRANS.ON@ ! transitive
@U.TRANS.OFF@ ! not transitive
@D.TRANS.OFF@ ! disallow transitive

@U.CONJ.ON@ ! with conjunction
@U.CONJ.OFF@ ! without conjunction

@U.SENSE.1@
@U.SENSE.2@
@U.SENSE.3@
@U.SENSE.4@

! For the guesser
^GUESSVERBSTEM^

LEXICON Root
													Conjunctions;
													Question;

LEXICON Conjunctions
وـ+conj@U.CONJ.ON@:وـ@U.CONJ.ON@							PreComp;
فـ+conj@U.CONJ.ON@:فـ@U.CONJ.ON@						PreComp;
													PreComp;

LEXICON PreComp
+token												Comp;

LEXICON Comp
! لام التعليل الناصبة
! وهناك أيضا لام الأمر الجازمة لكنها غير مدرجة في هذا البرنامج نظرا لعدم استخدامها في العربية الحديثة
لـ+comp@U.CASE.ACC@@U.T.PRES@:لـ@U.CASE.ACC@@U.T.PRES@	PreVerbPrefix;
! اللام الواقعة في جواب الشرط
لـ+comp@U.CONJ.OFF@@U.T.PAST@:لـ@U.CONJ.OFF@@U.T.PAST@	PreVerbPrefix;
! الاستقبال
سـ+fut+art@U.CASE.NOM@@U.T.PRES@:سـ@U.CASE.NOM@@U.T.PRES@	PreVerbPrefix;
+verb:0												VerbPrefix;

LEXICON Question
! Yes-No Question
أـ+ques@U.M.D@@U.CASE.NOM@:أـ@U.M.D@@U.CASE.NOM@			PreVerbPrefix;

LEXICON PreVerbPrefix
+token+verb:+token										VerbPrefix;

LEXICON VerbPrefix
@U.T.PRES@@U.V.A@+pres								PresentPrefix;
@U.T.PRES@@U.V.P@+pres+pass							PresentPassivePrefix;
@U.T.PAST@@U.V.A@+past									PastPrefix;
@U.T.PAST@@U.V.P@+past+pass								PastPassivePrefix;
@U.T.IRREL@@U.V.IR@@U.M.I@+imp							ImperativePrefix;

LEXICON PresentPrefix
+active+1pers+sg@U.PERS.1@:أ@U.PERS.1@						Verbs;
+active+1pers+pl@U.PERS.1@:ن@U.PERS.1@						Verbs;
+active+2pers@U.PERS.2@:ت@U.PERS.2@						Verbs;
+active+3pers@U.PERS.3A@:ي@U.PERS.3A@						Verbs;
+active+3pers+fem@U.PERS.3B@:ت@U.PERS.3B@					Verbs;

LEXICON PastPrefix
+active:0												Verbs;

LEXICON PresentPassivePrefix
! +1pers+sg@U.PERS.1@:أ@U.PERS.1@							Verbs;
! +1pers+pl@U.PERS.1@:ن@U.PERS.1@							Verbs;
! +2pers@U.PERS.2@:ت@U.PERS.2@							Verbs;
+3pers@U.PERS.3A@:ي@U.PERS.3A@							Verbs;
+3pers+fem@U.PERS.3B@:ت@U.PERS.3B@						Verbs;

LEXICON PastPassivePrefix
@U.PERS.3A@											Verbs;
@U.PERS.3B@											Verbs;

LEXICON ImperativePrefix
												Verbs;
